lexc/noun/enhufnevek.lexc
LEXICON AddNounjeek
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possje;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurek;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON AddNounja
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possja;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possja
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounae
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possae;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possae
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounjeh
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possjeh;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurjeh;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famjeh;

LEXICON Possjeh
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famjeh;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famjeh;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famjeh;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Famjeh;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famjeh;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famjeh;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famjeh;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Famjeh;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famjeh;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famjeh;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famjeh;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famjeh;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famjeh;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famjeh;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Famjeh;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Famjeh;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Famjeh;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Famjeh;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famjeh;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Famjeh;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famjeh;

LEXICON Plurjeh
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genjeh;
                            Genjeh;
        
LEXICON Famjeh
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genjeh;
                       Genjeh;

LEXICON Genjeh
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casejeh;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casejeh;
                       Casejeh;
 
LEXICON Casejeh
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVH§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVH§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounaet
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possaet;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possaet
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounbridzs
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possbridzs;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurbridzs;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fambridzs1;

LEXICON Possbridzs
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fambridzs;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fambridzs;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fambridzs;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fambridzs;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fambridzs;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fambridzs;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fambridzs;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fambridzs;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fambridzs;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fambridzs;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fambridzs;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fambridzs;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fambridzs1;

LEXICON Noun
akcióosztag AddNounae;
arányküszöb AddNounae;
betűosztag AddNounae;
borzeb AddNounae;
bridzs AddNounbridzs;
brókercsíny AddNounja;
bábaeskü AddNounae;
büntetőosztag AddNounae;
csapatcsíny AddNounja;
csendküszöb AddNounae;
csuklóseb AddNounae;
csíny AddNounja;
detektívosztag AddNounae;
diákcsíny AddNounja;
díjküszöb AddNounae;
elhárítóosztag AddNounae;
ellencsíny AddNounja;
faerőseb AddNounae;
fejseb AddNounae;
feszültségküszöb AddNounae;
frontosztag AddNounae;
fényküszöb AddNounae;
gerillaosztag AddNounae;
gimnazistacsíny AddNounja;
gyerekcsíny AddNounja;
gyermekcsíny AddNounja;
gyermekseb AddNounae;
gátlásküszöb AddNounae;
gúny AddNounja;
hadtáposztag AddNounae;
hasseb AddNounae;
homlokseb AddNounae;
huszárcsíny AddNounja;
házieb AddNounae;
hősseb AddNounae;
ingatlancsíny AddNounja;
iratweb AddNounae;
jogászcsíny AddNounja;
juhászeb AddNounae;
jurátuscsíny AddNounja;
kalózcsíny AddNounja;
kamaszcsíny AddNounja;
kamatküszöb AddNounae;
katonacsíny AddNounja;
katonaosztag AddNounae;
kivégzőosztag AddNounae;
korallküszöb AddNounae;
kutyaeskü AddNounae;
képzettségküszöb AddNounae;
küszöb AddNounae;
legénycsíny AddNounja;
lovasrohamosztag AddNounae;
lécküszöb AddNounae;
megértésküszöb AddNounae;
minizseb AddNounae;
méh AddNounae;
nemzetőreskü AddNounae;
nászeskü AddNounae;
osztag AddNounae;
paszpólzseb AddNounae;
pléh AddNounaet;
porkoláb AddNounae;
párbajseb AddNounae;
rablócsíny AddNounja;
reflexküszöb AddNounae;
robbanásküszöb AddNounae;
sah AddNounae;
slágerweb AddNounae;
stich AddNounjeh;
státuscsíny AddNounja;
szagküszöb AddNounae;
szerb AddNounae;
sírásküszöb AddNounae;
toleranciaküszöb AddNounae;
tolvajcsíny AddNounja;
térküszöb AddNounae;
vakküszöb AddNounae;
védőosztag AddNounae;
zebracsíny AddNounja;
záróosztag AddNounae;
államcsíny AddNounja;
államférfiú AddNounjeh;
éh AddNounae;
észlelésküszöb AddNounae;
ökörcsíny AddNounja;
úttörőcsíny AddNounja;
őrségosztag AddNounae;
Bátorkeszi AddNounjeek;
Gyulakeszi AddNounjeek;
Keszi AddNounjeek;
Magyarkeszi AddNounjeek;
Sárkeszi AddNounjeek;
Őssi AddNounjeek;
Greenwich AddNounjeh;
Zürich AddNounjeh;
Andreich AddNounjeh;
Argenti AddNounjeek;
Bereczki AddNounjeek;
Berti AddNounjeek;
Bittei AddNounjeek;
Brelich AddNounjeh;
Bánhegyi AddNounjeek;
Cillei AddNounjeek;
Cseterki AddNounjeek;
Czeglédi AddNounjeek;
Czillich AddNounjeh;
Debrőczi AddNounjeek;
Dersi AddNounjeek;
Devich AddNounjeh;
Divinyi AddNounjeek;
Drugeth AddNounae;
Edvi AddNounjeek;
Ehrenreich AddNounjeh;
Emich AddNounjeh;
Erdősi AddNounjeek;
Fejérkövi AddNounjeek;
Ferenczi AddNounjeek;
Fettich AddNounjeh;
Filstich AddNounjeh;
Friedreich AddNounjeh;
Friedrich AddNounjeh;
Fröhlich AddNounjeh;
Frölich AddNounjeh;
Fáskerti AddNounjeek;
Gedényi AddNounjeek;
Genersich AddNounjeh;
Gergei AddNounjeek;
Glücklich AddNounjeh;
Greinich AddNounjeh;
Gritti AddNounjeek;
Gélich AddNounjeh;
Gönczi AddNounjeek;
Heinrich AddNounjeh;
Hellmich AddNounjeh;
Herbich AddNounjeh;
Herrich AddNounjeh;
Hidvégi AddNounjeek;
Hittrich AddNounjeh;
Hüberth AddNounae;
Jánosréti AddNounjeek;
Kerezsi AddNounjeek;
Keéri AddNounjeek;
Kisdi AddNounjeek;
Krejcsi AddNounjeek;
Kékvölgyi AddNounjeek;
Körmöczi AddNounjeek;
Küküllei AddNounjeek;
Lesenyi AddNounjeek;
Lippich AddNounjeh;
Machiavelli AddNounjeek;
Megyericsei AddNounjeek;
Melich AddNounae;
Metternich AddNounjeh;
Miki AddNounjeek;
Minich AddNounjeh;
Moenich AddNounjeh;
Morelli AddNounjeek;
Mönich AddNounjeh;
Münnich AddNounjeh;
Nendtvich AddNounjeh;
Neszményi AddNounjeek;
Nyiri AddNounjeek;
Petki AddNounjeek;
Preisich AddNounjeh;
Péchi AddNounjeek;
Regéczi AddNounjeek;
Rerrich AddNounjeh;
Récsi AddNounjeek;
Rózsahelyi AddNounjeek;
Seltenreich AddNounjeh;
Selényi AddNounjeek;
Severini AddNounjeek;
Szecsődi AddNounjeek;
Szenczi AddNounjeek;
Szenthegyi AddNounjeek;
Sziveri AddNounjeek;
Széchényi AddNounjeek;
Szőllősi AddNounjeek;
Sükei AddNounjeek;
Tesseni AddNounjeek;
Tonelli AddNounjeek;
Ungvárnémeti AddNounjeek;
Velich AddNounjeh;
Veszelszki AddNounjeek;
Vigh AddNounae;
Weszelszki AddNounjeek;
Zsedényi AddNounjeek;
Züllich AddNounjeh;
